Massachusetts, session 194th, S431.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The Department of Elementary and Secondary Education, in partnership with school
districts, experts in social and emotional learning in school settings, the Massachusetts
Association of School Psychologists, Wayfinder Inc., workforce development agencies and
others, may develop a statewide "Portrait of a Graduate" which identifies seven competencies
that schools will support students to develop upon graduation from high school to help them
thrive in the 21st century and develop a state-wide resource for schools across the
Commonwealth. The 7 competencies may include character traits like (1) Self-Awareness, (2)
Adaptability, (3) Empathy, (4) Collaboration, (5) Agency, (6) Purpose, and (7) Responsible
Decision-making.
of 1